Georgia, session 2025_26, HB383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia High School NIL Protection Act."
H. B. 383
- 1 -

LC 49 2009
SECTION 2.
Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended in
Chapter 2, relating to elementary and secondary education, by adding a new article to read
as follows:
"ARTICLE 32A
20-2-2105.
As used in this article, the term:
(1) 'Athletic association' means any association of schools or any other similar
organization which acts as an organizing, sanctioning, scheduling, or rule-making body
for interscholastic athletic activities in which public high schools in this state participate.
(2) 'Compensation' means anything of value and shall include, but shall not be limited
to, a promise, performance, or forbearance provided by a promisor in exchange for his,
her, or its promise.
(3) 'High school' means a public or private school in this state that enrolls students in any
of grades nine through 12.
(4) 'Interscholastic athletic activity' means interscholastic athletic events, competitions,
scrimmages, exhibitions, practices, and training sessions.
(5) 'NIL compensation' means compensation received for the use of a person's name,
image, or likeness.
(6) 'Parent' means a person who has legal authority to act on behalf of a minor child as
a natural or adoptive parent or as a legal guardian.
(7) 'Participating school' means a public or private high school in this state that is a
member of an athletic association or participates in interscholastic athletic activities
which are conducted under the authority or rules of an athletic association.
H. B. 383
- 2 -

LC 49 2009
(8) 'Student athlete' means a student enrolled in a participating school who participates
in or is eligible to participate in any interscholastic athletic activity which is conducted
under the authority or rules of an athletic association. Such term shall include home
study students who participate in such interscholastic athletic activities as provided in
Code Section 20-2-319.6.
20-2-2105.1.
Nothing in this article shall be construed to abrogate, impair, or limit the authority of the
courts of this state or any department or agency of this state to enforce any provision of
federal or state law.
20-2-2105.2.
For purposes of this article, a scholarship from the participating school in which a student
athlete is enrolled that provides such student athlete with all or part of the cost of
enrollment and attendance at such participating school is not NIL compensation.
20-2-2105.3.
(a) Subject to the provisions of Code Sections 39-2-18 through 39-2-21, and except as
prohibited in this article, a student athlete shall be permitted to receive NIL compensation.
(b) No current or prospective student athlete shall be provided or shall receive NIL
compensation in exchange, in whole or in part, for attending, participating, or performing
at a particular participating school or a postsecondary educational institution as such term
is defined in Code Section 20-3-680.
(c) No participating school or entity whose purpose includes supporting or benefiting such
participating school or its interscholastic athletic activities or related programs or any
officer, director, employee, or agent of such participating school or entity shall provide a
current or prospective student athlete with NIL compensation.
H. B. 383
- 3 -

LC 49 2009
(d) No student athlete who receives NIL compensation pursuant to this article shall:
(1) Wear a school based team jersey or otherwise display a school's name, mascot, logo,
or any other school identifying marks when engaging in any conduct or activity in
exchange for receiving NIL compensation;
(2) Make any reference to a participating school or an athletic association when engaging
in any conduct or activity in exchange for receiving NIL compensation; or
(3)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, endorse or promote
any good or service of any party that provides NIL compensation to such student athlete
or of any third-party partner of a party that provides NIL compensation to such student
athlete during any interscholastic athletic activity, including, but not limited to:
(i) Wearing apparel of such party or third-party partner;
(ii) Displaying a logo or brand of such party or third-party partner; and
(iii) Displaying an insignia or identifying mark of such party or third-party partner.
(B) The prohibitions provided for in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not apply
to tryouts, practices, or training sessions.
(e) No student athlete shall receive NIL compensation for any conduct or activity that
reasonably can be perceived as endorsing or promoting:
(1) Alcohol products;
(2) Tobacco products, including, but not limited to, smokeless tobacco products;
(3) Vapor products;
(4) Cannabis products;
(5) Controlled substances;
(6) Prescription pharmaceuticals;
(7) Casinos and gambling, including sports betting, the lottery, and betting in connection
with video games, online games, and mobile devices;
(8) Adult entertainment or pornographic products and services;
H. B. 383
- 4 -

LC 49 2009
(9) Any product or service, including, but not limited to, online services and products,
that are restricted for people under the age of 18 years; or
(10) Weapons, firearms, and ammunition.
20-2-2105.4.
Each participating school in this state shall advise each student athlete in writing at the
beginning of the season of each interscholastic athletic activity of the provisions of this
article, Article 13 of Chapter 3 of this title, and Code Sections 39-2-18 through 39-2-21 and
shall provide each student athlete with information concerning the effect of receiving
money or other things of value on the student athlete's future eligibility to participate in
intercollegiate athletics.
20-2-2105.5.
The provisions of this article shall not apply to intramural athletic programs or events at
100 such participating schools.
101 20-2-2105.6.
102 (a) No contract that provides for NIL compensation to a student athlete shall survive after
103 the earlier of:
104 (1) Ten calendar days after the date upon which such student athlete graduates from a
105 participating school; or
106 (2) Thirty calendar days after the date upon which such student athlete's enrollment in
107 a participating school terminates for any reason provided for by Georgia law; the policies,
108 rules, or regulations of the State Board of Education; or the policies, rules, or regulations
109 of a nonpublic participating school, including, but not limited to, withdrawal,
110 nonattendance, dropping out, nonresidency in the participating school's attendance zone,
H. B. 383
- 5 -

LC 49 2009
111 nonresidency in this state, enrollment in a school that is not a participating school, and
112 expulsion.
113 (b) No contract that provides for NIL compensation to a student athlete shall include any
114 provision that does not comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section,
115 and any such provision shall be void and unenforceable.
116 20-2-2105.7.
117 (a) No athletic association shall prevent a student athlete from or penalize a student athlete
118 for receiving NIL compensation as provided for in this article.
119 (b) No athletic association shall prevent a participating school from participating in
120 interscholastic athletic activities, or otherwise penalize a participating school as a result of
121 a student athlete of such participating school receiving NIL compensation as provided for
122 in this article.
123 (c) No public school which receives funding under Article 6 of this chapter shall
124 participate in, sponsor, or provide coaching staff for interscholastic athletic activities which
125 are conducted under the authority of, conducted under the rules of, or scheduled by any
126 athletic association unless the charter, bylaws, or other governing documents of such
127 athletic association comply with this article.
128 20-2-2105.8.
129 (a) No participating school or athletic association shall prevent a student athlete from
130 obtaining professional representation in relation to contracts or legal matters, including, but
131 not limited to, representation provided by athlete agents who are certified as provided for
132 under Chapter 4A of Title 43 and legal representation provided by attorneys who are
133 licensed to practice law in this state.
H. B. 383
- 6 -

LC 49 2009
134 (b) Athlete agents representing student athletes shall comply with the federal Sports Agent
135 Responsibility and Trust Act, established in 15 U.S.C. Section 7801, et seq., in their
136 relationships with student athletes."
137 SECTION 3.
138 Title 39 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to minors, is amended in Chapter
139 2, relating to regulation of employment of minors, by revising Code Section 39-2-18, relating
140 to applicability of provisions of chapter to minors employed as actors or performers, as
141 follows:
142 "39-2-18.
143 (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, and provided that
144 the written consent of the Commissioner of Labor must be first obtained, nothing in this
145 chapter shall apply to any minor employed or compensated:
146 (1) As as an actor or performer in motion pictures or theatrical productions, in radio or
147 television productions, or in any other performance, concert, or entertainment;, or to any
148 minor employed in
149 (2) For the making of phonographic records; or as
150 (3) As an advertising or photographic model; or
151 (4) For the use of such minor's name, image, or likeness provided that the written consent
152 of the Commissioner of Labor must be first obtained,.
153 (b) Before the Commissioner of Labor shall give his or her written consent, as provided
154 in subsection (a) of this Code section, he or she shall investigate and determine that:
155 (1) The That the environment in which the work is to be performed is proper for the
156 minor;
157 (2) The terms and That the conditions of employment or compensation are not
158 detrimental to the health of the minor;
H. B. 383
- 7 -

LC 49 2009
159 (3) The That the minor's education will not be neglected or hampered by his or her
160 participation in any of the activities referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section; and
161 (4) Neither That the minor nor his or her name, image, or likeness will not be used for
162 pornographic purposes or for any purpose prohibited by subsection (e) of Code
163 Section 20-2-2105.3."
164 SECTION 4.
165 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
166 without such approval and shall apply to all contracts entered into or renewed on or after
167 such date.
168 SECTION 5.
169 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 383
- 8 -